Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 3 Limitation of Actions
§ 1-3-107.
Act, error or omission in rendering professional or health care services.

A cause of action arising from an act, error or omission in the rendering of licensed or certified professional or health care services shall be brought within the greater of the following times:

Within two (2) years of the date of the alleged act, error or omission, except that a cause of action may be instituted not more than two (2) years after discovery of the alleged act, error or omission, if the claimant can establish that the alleged act, error or omission was:

Not reasonably discoverable within a two (2) year period; or

The claimant failed to discover the alleged act, error or omission within the two (2) year period despite the exercise of due diligence.

For injury to the rights of a minor, by his eighth birthday or within two (2) years of the date of the alleged act, error or omission, whichever period is greater, except that a cause of action may be instituted not more than two (2) years after discovery of the alleged act, error or omission, if the claimant can establish that the alleged act, error or omission was:

Not reasonably discoverable within the two (2) year period; or

That the claimant failed to discover the alleged act, error or omission within the two (2) year period despite the exercise of due diligence.

For injury to the rights of a plaintiff suffering from a legal disability other than minority, within one (1) year of the removal of the disability;

If under paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection, the alleged act, error or omission is discovered during the second year of the two (2) year period from the date of the act, error or omission, the period for commencing a lawsuit shall be extended by six (6) months.

This section applies to all persons regardless of minority or other legal disability.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 18, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-18.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision concerning minors as parties to actions, see §

1-1-102

. As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Existing causes of action. —

Section 3, ch. 18, Laws 1976, reads: “(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this act, any action which could have been brought on the effective date of this act may be brought within the shorter of the following periods:

“(i) The period of the statute of limitations that would have applied to the action before the passage of this act; or

“(ii) The period of the statute of limitations specified in this act and applied as if the act, error or omission had occurred on the effective date of this act.”

Section 5, ch. 18, Laws 1976, makes the act effective on May 28, 1976.

Constitutionality—

Statute of
limitations for minors violated Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 8. The court also held that the exception now contained
in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-114

— “except for an action arising from
error or omission in the rendering of licensed or certified professional
or health care services” — was constitutionally infirm. Kordus v. Montes, 2014 WY 146, 337 P.3d 1138,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2014).

Termination of course of treatment and discovery of claim within first year.—

March 16, 2016 was the date on which the doctor last treated the patient and because she discovered her claim on March 29, 2016, at the latest, she discovered it within the first year following termination of treatment and the limitations period thus began running on March 16, 2016; the statute of limitations expired on June 25, 2018 and the patient’s complaint was untimely filed on June 29, 2018. Candelaria v. Karandikar, 2020 WY 140, 475 P.3d 548,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2020).

Time limitations based on year claim discovered.—

If a claim is discovered within the first year following an alleged act, error, or omission, the limitations period for medical malpractice claims is two years from the date of the alleged act, error, or omission; if a claim is discovered in the second year, the limitations period is two years and six months from the date of the alleged act, error, or omission. Candelaria v. Karandikar, 2020 WY 140, 475 P.3d 548,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2020).

Construction.—

For medical malpractice statute of limitations purposes, as to the meaning of the statute’s phrase, “within the greater of the following times,” the more reasonable interpretation is that it refers to the provisions that immediately follow it; in those cases where more than one of the subsections applies, the statute allows application of the one that provides the longer limitations period. Candelaria v. Karandikar, 2020 WY 140, 475 P.3d 548,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2020).

Six-month extension not applicable.—

Patient discovered her claim less than two weeks after her last treatment with the doctor not in the second year as discussed in case law, and therefore the six-month extension of the limitations period did not apply. Candelaria v. Karandikar, 2020 WY 140, 475 P.3d 548,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2020).

Running of statute for attorney malpractice.—

Plaintiff, who sought the return of a $30,000 retainer he paid defendant attorney to defend him against a first degree murder charge, knew or should have known of his alleged cause of action against defendant no later than January 19, 2017. Because plaintiff filed his complaint on May 9, 2019, the two-year professional malpractice statute of limitations barred plaintiff’s complaint. Foltz v. Oblasser, 2020 WY 51, 461 P.3d 417,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2020).

Federal law applicable to labor claim. —

The National Labor Relation Act's six month statute of limitations applies to an employee's claim of breach of duty of fair representation against his union, and not this section's two year limitations period for professional negligence. Winders v. United Transp. Union, 833 F. Supp. 860, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14157 (D. Wyo. 1993).

No exoneration prerequisite for malpractice claim against criminal defense attorney.—

Wyoming Supreme Court declines to create an exception to the discovery rule to adopt an exoneration prerequisite to bringing a legal malpractice claim against a criminal defense attorney, particularly when the professional malpractice statute of limitations makes no distinction between legal malpractice suits arising out of civil and criminal cases. Dockter v. Lozano, 2020 WY 119, 472 P.3d 362,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2020).

Application to realtors. —

A claim against a realtor is a claim for professional negligence, and realtors are licensed professionals who fall within the scope of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a); accordingly, the two-year limitations period of the section applies to all claims against realtors, even those that arose prior to July 1, 2000. Rawlinson v. Greer, 2003 WY 28, 64 P.3d 120,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2003).

Because a home owner and its occupants learned of water in their crawl space three years before they filed a negligence action against a real estate agency and an associate broker, the matter was time-barred under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a), and the trial court correctly granted the agency and broker summary judgment pursuant to W.R.C.P. 56(c). Rawlinson v. Greer, 2003 WY 28, 64 P.3d 120,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2003).

Professional negligence claim against real estate broker by non-client buyers asserting negligent misrepresentation was governed by the 2-year statute of limitations in this section. Hulse v. BHJ, Inc., 2003 WY 75, 71 P.3d 262,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2003).

Real estate
buyer's claim that the agent violated his duty of disclosure was
moot
on appeal because the district court's independent ruling that
the
statute of limitations had run trumped its first erroneous ruling on the question of duty, the buyer failed to challenge the district
court's statute of limitations ruling, and that ruling provided an
independent ground for dismissal.
Ferrell v. Knighten, 2013 WY 37, 298 P.3d 161,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2013).

Prisoner not under “legal disability”. —

Under
Wyo. Stat. Ann §

1-3-107

(2005), imprisonment is not a “legal disability other than minority” that suspends the running of the statute of limitations, because a convicted felon is not “legally dead” in Wyoming, and both convicted felons and prisoners have the right to file lawsuits.
Ballinger v. Thompson, 2005 WY 101, 118 P.3d 429,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2005).

Rule 6(a), W.R.C.P., applicable to computation of time under this section. —

Rule 6(a), W.R.C.P., setting guidelines for computation of time for court purposes, is applicable to the two-year time limit contained in this section; an application of Rule 6(a), W.R.C.P., does not enlarge the time periods provided for in this section but merely creates a uniform rule for determining when the time limit begins to run and when it ends. Olson v. Campbell County Memorial Hosp., 652 P.2d 1365,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 395

(Wyo. 1982).

Termination of course of treatment starts running of limitation period. —

The act, error or omission which starts the running of the statute of limitations against medical malpractice actions is the termination of the course of treatment for the same or related illnesses or injuries. Accordingly, the limitation period established by subsection (a)(i) began to run with respect to a claim against a doctor, for his failure to diagnose and properly treat a pituitary tumor, on the date he last treated the plaintiff. Metzger v. Kalke, 709 P.2d 414,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 603

(Wyo. 1985).

Plaintiff discovers wrongful “act” when learns that harm resulted from doctor's wrongful conduct. —

A plaintiff discovers an “alleged act, error or omission” within the meaning of subsection (a)(iv) when she learns that her harm resulted from the wrongful conduct of the defendant, not just when she discovers the harm itself. In a medical malpractice action, it did not matter what the plaintiff “suspected” or “should have known.” When she actually discovered the doctor's alleged wrong — his failure to diagnose her tumor, and the fact that he should have diagnosed it, given her symptoms and history — during the second year after its occurrence, she was entitled to rely on subsection (a)(iv). Metzger v. Kalke, 709 P.2d 414,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 603

(Wyo. 1985).

Attorneys' negligence “reasonably discoverable” within few months of bank failure. —

In a third party action by the directors of a failed bank against the attorneys whose negligence allegedly contributed to the failure, the negligence was reasonably discoverable at the time of the bank closure or within a few months thereafter and the claim, which was brought almost four years from the date the bank closed, was therefore barred by this section. Boller v. Western Law Ass'n, P.C., 828 P.2d 1184,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. Apr. 28, 1992), cert. denied, 506 U.S. 869, 113 S. Ct. 198, 121 L. Ed. 2d 140, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 5361 (U.S. 1992).

Plaintiff discovers wrongful “act” when learns that harm resulted from doctor's wrongful conduct. —

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

, with respect to the statute of limitations, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-107

, the date of the act, error, or omission had to be determined before it could be concluded that the patient timely filed a governmental claim against the doctor within the two-year period; date of discovery of employment relationship was crucial.
Jost v. Goss, 2010 WY 104, 236 P.3d 994,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2010).

Statute of limitations defense raised by motion to dismiss. —

A statute-of-limitations defense was appropriately raised in a Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., motion to dismiss for failure to state a claim where the answers, counterclaims, cross-claims and initial third-party claims filed by third-party plaintiffs reflected on their faces that the third-party claims were barred by the statute of limitations. Boller v. Western Law Ass'n, P.C., 828 P.2d 1184,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. Apr. 28, 1992), cert. denied, 506 U.S. 869, 113 S. Ct. 198, 121 L. Ed. 2d 140, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 5361 (U.S. 1992).

Plaintiff's claims all arose from acts, errors or omissions in the rendering of licensed or certified professional or health care services on December 5, 2012, but plaintiff failed to bring those claims within the two year limitations period. Therefore, the district court properly granted defendant's motion to dismiss.
Vance v. Wyomed Lab., Inc., 2016 WY 61, 375 P.3d 746,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2016).

Equitable estoppel not established. —

In a legal malpractice case, equitable estoppel, based on the attorney's alleged misleading statements to the client, did not apply to extend the time for filing suit because the client had all the essential facts for his cause of action more than two years before he filed suit. Ballinger v. Thompson, 2005 WY 101, 118 P.3d 429,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2005).

Discovery rule held inapplicable to legal malpractice suit. —

In a legal malpractice case based on a personal representative's attorney's allowing insurance on estate property to lapse, the discovery rule did not apply to extend the time for filing suit. Despite misleading statements the attorney allegedly made to the client, the client had all the essential facts for his cause of action more than two years before he filed suit. Ballinger v. Thompson, 2005 WY 101, 118 P.3d 429,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2005).

In negligence action against surveyors for conducting erroneous land surveys

and against the board of county commissioners for filing the surveys, the plaintiffs did not “discover” the tortious act for purposes of the accrual of their cause of action until they received a corrected land surveyor's report. The statute of limitations did not begin to run on an earlier date when the title insurance agent advised them that he would not continue to issue title insurance policies because of the survey discrepancies. Bredthauer v. Christian, Spring, Seilbach & Assocs., 824 P.2d 560,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1992).

Running of statute of limitation in suits charging negligent performance of professional duties. —

See Banner v. Dayton, 474 P.2d 300,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1970).

In legal malpractice action, for purposes of summary judgment motion, even where a factual dispute exists, the statute of limitations issue is still a question of law within the province of the court. Hiltz v. Robert W. Horn, P.C., 910 P.2d 566,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1996).

The statute of limitations for a legal malpractice cause of action had run where the action was commenced more than two years after defendant knew of had reason to know that he had a cause of action. Connell v. Barrett, 949 P.2d 871,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1997).

Where buyers purchased a home from sellers on June 1, 2006, where the buyers experienced significant flooding that required engineer-designed remediation on the house at a cost of more than $ 25,000, where the buyers filed suit against the sellers and the sellers'
real estate agent in September of 2007 alleging fraudulent non-disclosure, and where the buyers filed an amended complaint in August of 2008 to add their real estate agent and broker as defendants, summary judgment was properly granted in favor of the buyers'
real estate agent and broker because the two-year statute of limitations under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-107

began to run on the date of the alleged act or omission, which in this case was June 1, 2006, the last day that the real estate agent and broker performed professional services for the buyers under their contract. Further, no exception applied because the buyers had sufficient knowledge about the water problems and the non-disclosure of those problems; as such, any professional negligence by their agent and broker was reasonably discoverable within the statutory two-year period.
Adelizzi v. Stratton, 2010 WY 148, 243 P.3d 563,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2010).

Trial court properly granted summary judgment to defendant emergency room (ER) doctor based on the two-year statute of limitations for medical malpractice actions. The fact that defendant was out of state was not enough to toll the statute of limitations, given the fact that plaintiff had no intention of bringing legal action against the ER doctor within the limitation period.
Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011).

In a professional negligence case, the engineering corporation’s motion for summary judgment was improperly granted as the non-profit corporation’s claims against it were not time-barred because genuine issues of material fact existed as to when the non-profit should reasonably have been on notice that it needed to investigate the adequacy of the design, plans, and specifications for the building as questions remained regarding whether the 2006 incident of bird in the attic of the building; the 2007 incident of cracking concrete in the covered parking area, or the 2013 incident of a binding door and plaster cracks in the building should have put the non-profit on notice of the engineering corporation’s alleged negligence. Pioneer Homestead Apts. III v. Sargent Eng'rs, Inc., 2018 WY 80, 421 P.3d 1074,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2018).

Bail bondsman did not establish that his activities fit within the professional duties of bail bondsman, and therefore the trial court erred by applying
the two-year statute of limitations which applied to the rendering of professional services to the pedestrian's action. It was not established
that taking custody of persons who had been arrested following their release was part of the professional responsibilities of a bail bondsman as nothing in the complaint alleged that a bondsman received raining in such activity or that knowledge of such practices was required
for licensure. Irene v. Seneca Ins. Co., 2014 WY 145, 337 P.3d 483,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2014).

Continuing treatment. —

Trial court erred in granting summary judgment to a doctor in a malpractice suit, finding that the Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-107

statute of limitations had run. The final act in the surgeon's continuous course of treatment was the second surgery performed on February 26, 1999, to remove a surgical sponge, not the first surgery to repair the torn rotator cuff, and the suit was brought within two years of the date of the second surgery. Jauregui v. Mem'l Hosp., 2005 WY 59, 111 P.3d 914,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. June 8, 2005), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Running of statute for attorney malpractice. —

The statute of limitations for the claim of attorney malpractice began to run when both attorney and client learned that the estate would be subject to the payment of interest on taxes and potential penalties. Murphy v. Housel & Housel, 955 P.2d 880,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. Apr. 8, 1998).

Client's legal malpractice suit was properly dismissed as time-barred under Wyo. Stat. Ann § 1-3-107(a); his imprisonment was not a ‘legal disability other than minority’ under § 1-3-107(a)(iii) so as to extend the statute of limitations, as the statute did not list imprisonment as a disability, and in Wyoming, prisoners had the right to file lawsuits. Ballinger v. Thompson, 2005 WY 101, 118 P.3d 429,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2005).

Continuous representation doctrine. —

The court rejected defendant's contention that the continuous representation doctrine tolled the statute of limitations because Wyoming has not adopted the continuous representation doctrine. Connell v. Barrett, 949 P.2d 871,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1997).

In a legal malpractice case based on a personal representative's attorney's allowing insurance on estate property to lapse, the continuous representation doctrine did not extend the time for the client to file suit, because that doctrine was absent from Wyoming's legal malpractice statute, and the Wyoming Supreme Court declined to judicially adopt it. Ballinger v. Thompson, 2005 WY 101, 118 P.3d 429,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2005).

Discharge from hospital started running of limitation period. —

Patient's
medical malpractice claim was timely under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a)(i) because he presented his claim just under two years from
the date of his discharge; he presented evidence that the hospital
treated him for the pain and dysfunction in his shoulder and arm until
he was discharged. Nobles v. Mem'l Hosp. of Laramie County, 2013 WY 66, 301 P.3d 517,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2013).

Statute of repose asserted on remand. —

Because a statute of repose and a statute of limitations can be applied to the same facts to bar the same cause of action, they are not truly inconsistent; therefore, a defendant land surveyor could subsequently assert on remand a new statute of limitations (§ 1-3-111(a)) labeled as a statute of repose, after stipulating in the prior adjudication that subsection (a)(i) of this section controlled the case.
Bredthauer v. TSP, 864 P.2d 442,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. Dec. 21, 1993).

Construction with wrongful death statute. —

This section and the wrongful death statute (§

1-38-101

) must be construed together; thus, where a decedent had failed to bring his claim against a physician and hospital within two-years, he had no viable action at the time of his death and a wrongful death action on behalf of his survivors was barred.
Edwards v. Fogarty, 962 P.2d 879,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 1998).

Section applies to licensed outfitters. —

Supreme Court of Wyoming held that the plain language of the Wyoming Outfitters and Guides Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

23-2-407

, defined guides as “professional,” and that it need not look any further than the plain language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a) to conclude that the two-year statute of limitations applied to causes of action arising from an act, error or omission in the rendering of licensed outfitter or professional guide services.
Prokop v. Hockhalter, 2006 WY 75, 137 P.3d 131,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2006).

Where a customer was injured during a hunting expedition, the two-year statute of limitations clearly applied to an outfitting company and one of its members because they were licensed outfitters; the statute of limitations also applied to the other member because the suit against the other member arose from the same act, error, or omission that the customer asserted caused the injuries.
Bylin v. Billings, 568 F.3d 1224, 2009 U.S. App. LEXIS 13557 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2009), cert. denied, 559 U.S. 936, 130 S. Ct. 1506, 176 L. Ed. 2d 110, 2010 U.S. LEXIS 1204 (U.S. 2010).

Section applies to licensed outfitters whether claim based in tort or contract. —

Supreme Court of Wyoming held that the 2-year statute of limitations for professionals in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a) applied to actions brought against licensed outfitters and professional guides, and if the cause of action against an outfitter or a guide arose from the rendering of licensed or certified professional services, the 2 year statute of limitations in § 1-3-107(a) applied whether the claim against them was pled in tort or contract.
Prokop v. Hockhalter, 2006 WY 75, 137 P.3d 131,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2006).

Action relating to obtaining credit not based on rendering professional or health care services. —

Two-year statute of limitations under this section did not apply because a patient's claim under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act that a dentist committed unfair and deceptive trade practices by compelling to her obtain a credit card to settle her account was not based on the rendering of professional or health care services. St. John v. Joshua G. Wagner, DDS, PC, 2013 WY 69, 302 P.3d 906,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2013).

Due diligence. —

In a sale of property that did not reserve plaintiffs' mineral interests in the property, although plaintiffs sued the closing agent, its general counsel, and the brokerage firm involved in the transaction more than seven years after the sale, because a genuine issue of material fact existed as to whether plaintiffs exercised due diligence by trusting the representation of the closing agent's employee that the deeds had been changed to reserve plaintiffs' mineral interests in the property had to be evaluated in light of all the facts, summary judgment was improperly granted to the closing agent and its general counsel in light of the employee's representations. Moats v. Prof'l Assistance, LLC, 2014 WY 6, 319 P.3d 892,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2014).

Statute of limitations not extended by third party misrepresentations. —

In a sale of property that did not reserve plaintiffs' mineral interests in the property, where plaintiffs sued the closing agent, its general counsel, and the brokerage firm involved in the transaction more than seven years after the sale, summary judgment was properly granted in favor of the brokerage firm as the misrepresentations by the closing agent's employee should not extend the statute of limitations as to the brokerage firm. Moats v. Prof'l Assistance, LLC, 2014 WY 6, 319 P.3d 892,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2014).

Ranch's action against corporation for failure to provide services was time-barred. —

Finding that a ranch's action seeking damages resulting from a corporation's failure to provide engineering and surveying services was time-barred was appropriate because, whether Wyo. Stat. §

1-3-107

began to run on the date of the act, error or omission, or on the date the cause of action accrued, the lawsuit was untimely. The ranch's cause of action was time-barred if not commenced within two years of the act, error or omission giving rise to the cause of action, or if, the two-year time limit started to run upon “accrual” of the cause of action, the ranch's claim was still time barred because the cause of action accrued on or before May 5, 2005.
Lucky Gate Ranch, L.L.C. v. Baker & Assocs., 2009 WY 69, 208 P.3d 57,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Echols v. Keeler, 735 P.2d 730,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 426

(Wyo. 1987); Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987); Sharsmith v. Hill, 764 P.2d 667,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1988); Mills v. Garlow, 768 P.2d 554,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

Richardson Assocs. v. Lincoln-Devore, Inc., 806 P.2d 790,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1991); Walters v. Grand Teton Crest Outfitters, Inc., 804 F. Supp. 1442, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15892 (D. Wyo. 1992); Peters v. W. Park Hosp., 2003 WY 117, 76 P.3d 821,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Lesh v. Allstate Ins. Co., 723 F. Supp. 624, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12514 (D. Wyo. 1989);
Bender v. Phillips, 8 P.3d 1074,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 2000);
Rawlinson v. Cheyenne Bd. of Pub. Utils., 2001 WY 6, 17 P.3d 13,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2001); Hoke v. Motel
6 Jackson & Accor N. Am., Inc., 2006 WY 38, 131 P.3d 369,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. Mar. 27, 2006).

Law reviews. —

See note, “The Statute of Limitations in Actions for Undiscovered Malpractice,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 30.

See case note on Lutheran Hosps. & Homes Soc'y of America v. Yepsen, 469 P.2d 409,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1970), VII Land & Water L. Rev. 717 (1972).

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For case note, “Appeal and Error” —The Omnipotent Wyoming Supreme Court: New Allegations and Evidence Will Be Heard for the First Time on Appeal. Boller v. Western Law Associates, 828 P.2d 1184,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 677 (1993).

For case note, “Should a Wrongful Death Action Expire Before the Decedent Does? A Wrong Turn for Wrongful Death,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 235 (2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When statute of limitation begins to run upon action against attorney for malpractice, 18 ALR3d 978.

Application of statute of limitations to damage actions against public accountants for negligence in performance of professional services, 26 ALR3d 1438.

When statute of limitations commences to run against malpractice action based on leaving foreign substance in patient's body, 70 ALR3d 7.

Statute of limitations relating to medical malpractice actions as applicable to actions against unlicensed practitioner, 70 ALR3d 114.

When statute of limitations begins to run against malpractice action in connection with sterilization or birth control procedures, 93 ALR3d 218.

When statute of limitations begins to run in dental malpractice suits, 3 ALR4th 318.

What statute of limitations governs physician's action for wrongful denial of hospital privileges, 3 ALR4th 1214.

Statute of limitations applicable to third person's action against psychiatrist, psychologist or other mental health practitioner, based on failure to warn persons against whom patient expressed threats, 41 ALR4th 1078.

Time of discovery as affecting running of statute of limitations in wrongful death action, 49 ALR4th 972.

Applicability of “foreign object” exception in medical malpractice statutes of limitations, 50 ALR4th 250.

Statute of limitations in wrongful death action based on medical malpractice, 70 ALR4th 535.

When limitations period begins to run on claim for optometrist's malpractice, 70 ALR4th 600.

Medical malpractice liability of sports medicine care providers for injury to, or death of, athlete, 33 ALR5th 619.

When statute of limitations begins to run upon action against attorney for legal malpractice — deliberate wrongful acts or omissions, 67 ALR5th 587.

Medical malpractice statutes of limitation minority provisions, 71 ALR5th 307.

Surveyor's liability for mistake in, or misrepresentation as to accuracy of, survey of real property, 117 ALR5th 23.

Effect of fraudulent or negligent concealment of patient's cause of action on timeliness of action under medical malpractice statute of repose. 19 A.L.R.6th 475.

§ 1-3-108.
Official bonds and statutory undertakings.

An action upon the official
bond of an officer, assignee, trustee, executor, administrator or
guardian, or upon a bond given in pursuance of a statute can only
be brought within ten (10) years after the cause of action accrues.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 37; R.S. 1887, § 2373; R.S. 1899, § 3458; C.S. 1910, § 4302; C.S. 1920, § 5571; R.S. 1931, § 89-413; C.S. 1945, § 3-508; W.S. 1957, § 1-20; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “Abstractor's Liability in Examination of Title,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 184.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What period of limitation governs in an action against a public officer and a surety on official bond, 18 ALR2d 1176.

Liability on statutory bond as within statute of limitations prescribing specific limitation period for liabilities created by statute, 32 ALR2d 1240.

What statute of limitations governs action to reform bond, 36 ALR2d 687.

Limitation statute applicable to action on bonds of public body, 38 ALR2d 930.

When statute of limitations begins to run against action on bond of personal representative, 44 ALR2d 807.

§ 1-3-109.
Actions not otherwise limited.

An action for relief,
not hereinbefore provided for, can only be brought within ten (10)
years after the cause of action accrues.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 38; R.S. 1887, § 2374; R.S. 1899, § 3459; C.S. 1910, § 4303; C.S. 1920, § 5572; R.S. 1931, § 89-414; C.S. 1945, § 3-509; W.S. 1957, § 1-21; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Applicable in all actions whether formerly denominated at law
or in equity. —

Since actions at law and suits in equity are blended and there is in Wyoming but one form of action, called a civil action, the statutes of limitations apply in all actions whether formerly denominated at law or in equity. Town of Glenrock v. Abadie, 71 Wyo. 414, 259 P.2d 766,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1953). See Rule 2, W.R.C.P.

But section is available in judicial proceedings only as defense

and can never be asserted by a plaintiff as a cause of action in him or as conferring upon him an affirmative right of action. The principle has sometimes been expressed in the figure of speech that the statute is available only as a shield, not as a sword. Northern Pacific R. Co. v. United States, 277 F.2d 615, 1960 U.S. App. LEXIS 5155 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1960).

When no justiciable controversy. —

There is no justiciable controversy as contemplated by Declaratory Judgment Act where it appears on face of the pleadings that the statute of limitations is applicable thereto. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Right to reformation of deed barred. —

In an action brought by a town to quiet title to a one-half interest in minerals underlying property conveyed by defendant to the town 30 years before, defendant's cross-petition for reformation of the deed was barred by this section. Town of Glenrock v. Abadie, 71 Wyo. 414, 259 P.2d 766,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 72 Wyo. 111, 262 P.2d 393,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1953).

In an action to quiet title, wherein a cross-petition was filed for reformation of a deed, the fact that the parties and their positions remained the same as they were when the deeds in question were made, and the rights of innocent purchasers for value without notice were not concerned, was no defense to the running of the statute of limitations upon the right of action for reformation of the deed. Town of Glenrock v. Abadie, 72 Wyo. 111, 262 P.2d 393,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1953).

Reformation of warranty deed not permitted where deed clearly
conveys title. —

Inasmuch as a 1933 warranty deed clearly conveyed the land being disputed in a quiet title action with no reservations whatsoever, the court did not permit reformation to express the alleged intent of the party that the property was conveyed to be used solely as an airport, which would have been a clear violation of this section. Samuel Mares Post No. 8, Am. Legion v. Board of County Comm'rs, 697 P.2d 1040,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

United States v. Northern Pac. Ry., 169 F. Supp. 735, 1959 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3874 (D. Wyo. 1959); Trustees of Wyo. Laborers Health & Welfare Plan v. Morgen & Oswood Constr. Co., 850 F.2d 613, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 8635 (10th Cir. 1988).

Stated

in

Wyoming Constr. Co. v. Western Cas. & Sur. Co., 275 F.2d 97,

1960 U.S. App. LEXIS 5521

(10th Cir. 1960); Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 23, 2010).

Cited

in

Wolbol v. Steinhoff, 25 Wyo. 227, 168 P. 251,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1917); Cook v. Elmore, 27 Wyo. 163, 192 P. 824,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1920); Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. Lincoln Land Co., 54 Wyo. 320, 92 P.2d 572,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1939); Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1940); Badley v. Birchby, 487 P.2d 798,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1971); Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What statute of limitations governs physician's action for wrongful denial of hospital privileges, 3 ALR4th 1214.

Laches or acquiescence as defense, so as to bar recovery of arrearages of permanent alimony or child support, 5 ALR4th 1015.

State statute of limitations applicable to inverse condemnation or similar proceedings by landowner to obtain compensation for direct appropriation of land without the institution or conclusion of formal proceedings against specific owner, 26 ALR4th 68.

Limitation of actions: invasion of right of privacy, 33 ALR4th 479.

§ 1-3-110.
“Substantial completion” defined.

As used in this act [§§

1-3-110

through

1-3-113

] “substantial completion” means the degree of completion
at which the owner can utilize the improvement for the purpose for
which it was intended.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-21.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

“Substantial completion.”

Homeowners'
suit alleging defects in a condominium's HVAC system was not barred
by the statute of repose because (1) the statute began to run when
the condominium and system were substantially completed, as defined
in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-110

, which occurred when the condominium and system could
be used for their intended purposes, and (2) the condominium and system
could not be used for their intended purposes until a certificate
of occupancy was issued less than ten years before the homeowners
filed suit. Horning v. Penrose Plumbing & Heating, Inc., 2014 WY 133, 336 P.3d 151,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2014).

Cited

in

Worden v. Village Homes, 821 P.2d 1291,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1991).